Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2,142
School district; incorporate dating
violence education.

Each school district shall incorporate dating violence education
that is age-appropriate into the school program. Dating violence education
shall include, but not be limited to, defining dating violence, recognizing
dating violence warning signs, and identifying characteristics of healthy
dating relationships.

Laws 2009, LB63, § 47.